Florida, session 2026, SB580.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âSection 163.212, Florida Statutes, is created 10 and incorporated into part I of chapter 163, Florida Statutes, 11 to read: 12 163.212âAuthorized local licensing of occupations.âIn 13 accordance with s. 163.211(2)(b), a county or municipality may, 14 within its jurisdiction, license a home caregiver. 15 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.